California, session 20252026, AB1903.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 910 of the Civil Code is amended to read:910. Prior to filing an action against any party alleged to have contributed to a violation of the standards set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 896), the claimant shall initiate the following prelitigation procedures:(a) (1) The claimant or their legal representative shall provide a written notice via certified mail, overnight mail, or personal delivery to the builder, in the manner prescribed in this section, of the claimant’s claim that the construction of their residence violates any of the standards set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 896). The(2) The notice shall state that the claimant alleges a violation pursuant to this title against the builder.(3) The notice shall be signed by the claimant and provide the claimant.(4) The notice shall include all of the following:(A) The claimant’s name, address, and preferred method of contact, and shall state that the claimant alleges a violation pursuant to this title against the builder, and shall describe contact.(B) A description of the claimed violation in reasonable detail sufficient to determine the nature and location, to the extent known, of the claimed violation and the evidence violation.(C) Evidence of the claimed violation. The notice shall include the address of the residence, a description of the evidence of the violation, including copies of any reasonably available photographs, estimates, or reports relating to any damage to the extent they exist at the time the notice is provided, and the specific location of the evidence within the residence. In the case of a group of homeowners or an association, the notice shall be signed by each affected homeowner and shall include the same information required for an individual notice. For claims involving common areas, the notice shall be verified by the president of the association, and shall include the same information for an individual notice. The the evidence.(5) The notice shall have the same force and effect as a notice of commencement of a legal proceeding.(b) The notice requirements of this section do not preclude a homeowner from seeking redress through any applicable normal customer service procedure as set forth in any contractual, warranty, or other builder-generated document; and, if a homeowner seeks to do so, that request shall not satisfy the notice requirements of this section.SEC. 2. Section 926 of the Civil Code is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 926 is added to the Civil Code, to read:926. The builder may obtain a release or waiver of any kind in exchange for the repair work pursuant to this chapter one year after the conclusion of the repair.SEC. 4. Section 930 of the Civil Code is amended to read:930. (a) The time periods and all other requirements in this chapter are to be strictly construed, and, unless extended by the mutual agreement of the parties in accordance with this chapter, shall govern the rights and obligations under this title. If a builder fails to act in accordance with this section within the timeframes mandated, unless extended by the mutual agreement of the parties as evidenced by a postclaim written confirmation by the affected homeowner demonstrating that they have knowingly and voluntarily extended the statutory timeframe, the claimant may proceed with filing an action. If this occurs, the standards of the other chapters of this title shall continue to apply to the action.(b) If the claimant does not substantially conform with the requirements of this chapter, the builder may bring a motion to dismiss without prejudice any court action or other proceeding and the motion shall be granted. The court, in its discretion, may award the prevailing party on the motion, their reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in bringing or opposing the motion.SEC. 5. Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 939) is added to Title 7 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, to read: CHAPTER 4.5. Certified Buildings939. Compliance with this chapter is optional in the sole discretion of the builder. This chapter may be used in connection with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 910), on its own, or with alternative nonadversarial contractual provisions pursuant to Section 914.939.1. A building may obtain a certified building status by undergoing private inspection, repairs, and reinspection during construction in addition to any inspections conducted by the local public agency. The inspections shall take place at least once relating to all of the following:(a) Grading(b) Foundations.(c) Framing, flashing, windows, and drywall.(d) Plumbing.(e) Exterior applications such as stucco, siding, and roofs.(f) Mandatory health and safety features, including, but not limited to, seismic safety and fire suppression features.939.2. Once inspections and repairs, if appropriate, during construction are conducted and approved by the inspector, the inspector shall certify that the building is a certified building. Once certified, there shall not be future challenges to the status of the building as a certified building.939.3. (a) The builder of a certified building may establish its own process for handling postconstruction claims made pursuant to this title that includes a notice provided by the claimant, inspections, and repairs by the builder. The builder may include some, none, or all of the provisions in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 910) in the builder’s process pursuant to this chapter.(b) The builder shall pay for its own costs to determine necessary repairs. A builder shall have the complete and unrestricted right to inspect and repair a certified building at times mutually agreed upon by the claimant and the builder within timeframes established by the builder’s process. If the claimant refuses the offer of repair or prevents, restricts, delays, or frustrates access for more than seven days from the mutually agreed upon day, then the repairs are deemed completed and the builder shall be deemed to have received the release described in subdivision (c).(c) If the claimant makes a claim relating to a certified building and the builder responds by performing repairs that are inspected and approved by the inspector, the claimant shall be deemed to have granted a full and general release, including a waiver of Section 1542, related to the claims asserted in the written notice pursuant to Section 910 or as otherwise required by the builder’s process established under subdivision (a). The release applies to the builder and all other parties identified in Section 936 relating to the certified building.(d) No action may be filed unless all of the following are satisfied:(1) A notice of claim is presented before the filing of the action.(2) Observable evidence of the alleged violation and damage has been provided to the builder.(3) The repair does not receive an approval by the inspector pursuant to subdivision (c) after full compliance with this chapter has been achieved.(e) The builder may elect to use this chapter with or without a warranty. If the builder elects to provide a warranty, the warranty shall be provided to the homeowner no later than the close of escrow.939.4. (a) For purposes of this chapter, the inspector shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) The inspector shall be a private licensed architect, engineer, or general contractor.(2) The inspector shall not have a direct or indirect financial interest in the builder, the developer, or any entity affiliated with the builder or developer.(3) The inspector shall not have received, in the aggregate, more than 10 percent of the inspector’s gross professional revenue from the builder, the builder’s affiliates, or the builder’s subcontractors during the two calendar years preceding the first inspection performed under this chapter.(4) The inspector shall not be, and shall not have been within the preceding five years, an employee, an agent of the builder, the developer, or any subcontractor that performed work on the project and shall not have been an officer or director of the builder, the developer, or any subcontractor that performed work on the project.(b) The inspector shall certify in writing, to the Department of Real Estate, that the inspector meets the criteria of subdivision (a).(c) On or before July 1, 2028, the Department of Real Estate shall post on its internet website a list of inspectors eligible to perform inspection under this chapter.939.5. This chapter shall only apply to condominium projects, as defined in Section 4125, or a townhouse development constructed on or after January 1, 2027.SEC. 6. Section 942 of the Civil Code is amended to read:942. (a) In order to make a claim for violation of the standards set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 896), a claimant shall affirmatively demonstrate all of the following, in accordance with the applicable evidentiary standards:(1) There is a violation of the applicable standard.(2) The violation caused appreciable, nonspeculative, present physical damage to another component part of the building, consistent with Aas v. Superior Court (2000), 24 Cal.4th 627.(3) The violation is caused by the original construction.(b) All claims are subject to the affirmative defenses set forth in Section 945.5.SEC. 7. Section 942.2 is added to the Civil Code, to read:942.2. An insurer may not assert repairs as a voluntary payment or as a payment made without the insurer’s consent, or deny counting the costs associated with those repairs, whether pursuant to a warranty or not, against a deductible or self-insured retention.SEC. 8. Section 944 of the Civil Code is amended to read:944. If a claim for damages is made under this title, the homeowner is only entitled to damages for the reasonable value of repairing any violation of the standards set forth in this title, the reasonable cost of repairing any damages caused by the repair efforts, the reasonable cost of repairing and rectifying any damages resulting from the failure of the home to meet the standards, the reasonable cost of removing and replacing any improper repair by the builder, reasonable relocation and storage expenses, lost business income if the home was used as a principal place of a business licensed to be operated from the home, and all other costs or fees recoverable by contract or statute.SEC. 9. Section 945.1 is added to the Civil Code, to read:945.1. Notwithstanding any other law, an action may not be filed pursuant to this title unless the conditions for filing an action pursuant to this title have been met for each claimed violation.SEC. 10. Section 945.2 is added to the Civil Code, to read:945.2. No investigative costs are recoverable. Stearman v. Centex Homes (2000) 78 Cal.App.4th 611 is abrogated. No claim for damages based on extrapolation of claims may be made. Testing of any components of the structure are limited to conditions that would realistically be expected in the location of the component part of the building.SEC. 11.Section 5800 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5800.(a)A volunteer officer or volunteer director described in subdivision (e) of an association that manages a common interest development that is residential or mixed use shall not be personally liable in excess of the coverage of insurance specified in paragraph (4) to any person who suffers injury, including, but not limited to, bodily injury, emotional distress, wrongful death, or property damage or loss as a result of the tortious act or omission of the volunteer officer or volunteer director if all of the following criteria are met:(1)The act or omission was performed within the scope of the officer’s or director’s association duties.(2)The act or omission was performed in good faith.(3)The act or omission was not willful, wanton, or grossly negligent.(4)The association maintained and had in effect at the time the act or omission occurred and at the time a claim is made one or more policies of insurance that shall include coverage for (A) general liability of the association and (B) individual liability of officers and directors of the association for negligent acts or omissions in that capacity; provided that both types of coverage are in the following minimum amounts:(A)At least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) if the common interest development consists of 100 or fewer separate interests.(B)At least one million dollars ($1,000,000) if the common interest development consists of more than 100 separate interests.(b)The payment of actual expenses incurred by a director or officer in the execution of the duties of that position does not affect the director’s or officer’s status as a volunteer within the meaning of this section.(c)An officer or director who at the time of the act or omission was a declarant, or who received either direct or indirect compensation as an employee from the declarant, or from a financial institution that purchased a separate interest at a judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust on real property, is not a volunteer for the purposes of this section.(d)Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability of the association for its negligent act or omission or for any negligent act or omission of an officer or director of the association.(e)This section shall only apply to a volunteer officer or director who is a tenant of a residential separate interest in the common interest development or is an owner of no more than two separate interests and whose ownership in the common interest development consists exclusively of residential separate interests.(f)(1)For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the scope of the officer’s or director’s association duties shall include, but shall not be limited to, both of the following decisions:(A)Whether or not to conduct an investigation of the common interest development for latent deficiencies prior to the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations.(B)Whether or not to commence a civil action against the builder for defects in design or construction.(2)It is the intent of the Legislature that this section clarify the scope of association duties to which the protections against personal liability in this section apply. It is not the intent of the Legislature that these clarifications be construed to expand, or limit, the fiduciary duties owed by the directors or officers.SEC. 12.Section 6150 of the Civil Code is amended to read:6150.(a)Not later than 30 days before filing of any civil action by the association against the declarant or other developer of a common interest development for alleged damage to the common areas, alleged damage to the separate interests that the association is obligated to maintain or repair, or alleged damage to the separate interests that arises out of, or is integrally related to, damage to the common areas or separate interests that the association is obligated to maintain or repair, the board shall provide a written notice to each member of the association who appears on the records of the association when the notice is provided with a courtesy copy of a sample of what was sent to the members simultaneously provided to the builder, as defined in Section 911. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail, certified and return receipt requested. This notice shall specify all of the following:(1)That a meeting will take place to discuss problems that may lead to the filing of a civil action, in addition to the potential impacts thereof to the association and its members, including any financial impacts.(2)The options, including civil actions, that are available to address the problems.(3)The time and place of the meeting.(4)The following statement, in 12-point, bold type: “THE FILING OF A CIVIL ACTION MAY AFFECT THE VALUE OF YOUR RESIDENCE, YOUR ABILITY TO SELL YOUR RESIDENCE, OR YOUR ABILITY TO REFINANCE YOUR MORTGAGE. IT MAY ALSO REQUIRE YOU TO PROVIDE ACCESS TO YOUR RESIDENCE, PARTICIPATE IN DEPOSITIONS OR RESPONDING TO DISCOVERY REQUESTS, AND TO MAKE OTHER DISCLOSURES TO FUTURE POTENTIAL BUYERS.”(b)Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the applicable statute of limitations will expire before the association files the civil action, the association may give the notice, as described above, within 30 days after the filing of the action. In this case, the builder may raise laches as a defense, in addition to any other available defense.